Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.030

Rules—Administration and interpretation of title.

(1) The director shall have power to adopt uniform rules in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to govern examinations and reports of banks, trust companies, and holding companies and the form in which they shall report their assets, liabilities, and reserves, charge off bad debts and otherwise keep their records and accounts, and otherwise to govern the administration of this title.

(2) The director shall have the power, and broad administrative discretion, to administer and interpret the provisions of this title to facilitate the delivery of financial services to the citizens of the state of Washington by the banks, trust companies, and holding companies subject to this title.

[ 2014 c 37 s 105; 2010 c 88 s 5; 1994 c 92 s 8; 1986 c 279 s 1; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.030. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 58, part; RRS s 3265, part. Formerly RCW 30.04.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.